Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2834YC (2) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 80B.13A, subsection 3, paragraphs a and 1 b, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 a. For any other grounds authorized by rules adopted 3 pursuant to section 80B.11, subsection 1 , paragraph âhâ , or 4 section 80D.4A The law enforcement officer or reserve peace 5 officer has been discharged for good cause from employment as a 6 law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer . 7 b. W hen an employing agency recommends to the council that 8 revocation or suspension would be appropriate with regard 9 to a current or former employee. A recommendation by an 10 employing agency must be in writing and set forth the reasons 11 why the action is being recommended, the findings of the 12 employing agency concerning the matter, the action taken by the 13 employing agency, and that the action by the agency is final 14 The law enforcement officer or reserve peace officer leaves, 15 voluntarily quits, or the officerâs position is eliminated 16 when disciplinary action was pending, under circumstances 17 warranting the discharge of the law enforcement officer or 18 under circumstances warranting the removal of the reserve peace 19 officer for good cause . 20 Sec. 2. Section 80B.13A, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsection: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. No grounds for revocation actions may be 23 maintained other than as expressly provided in this section. 24 Any actions pending before the council on grounds other than 25 expressly provided for in this section shall be immediately 26 dismissed. 27